src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
==> sourced from phonology-rules/twolc_header <==
This file is produced automatically from the script make_twolc.sh
Instead, edit the component file(s) in the 
phonology-rules/ directory and then run `sh make_twolc.sh`.

==> sourced from phonology-rules/000 <==
============================================================================

01_base_rules.twolc
02_stem_palatalization.twolc
03_spellingrule-husher.twolc
04_spellingrule-velar.twolc
05_spellingrule-c.twolc
06_fleeting-vowel-deletion.twolc
07_fleeting-vowel-insertion.twolc
08_nouns_ie-ii.twolc
09_stress.twolc
Genitive plural of nouns
Comparative adjectives
Masculine short-form adjectives
Stem alternations
Vowels in nonpast endings
Imperatives
Verbal prefix fleeting vowels and voicing assimilation

* *рабо́та>у*
* *рабо́т0>у*
* ★*рабо́та>у* (is not standard language)
* ★*рабо́та>0* (is not standard language)

==> sourced from phonology-rules/001 <==
============================================================================
* *сло́во>а́*
* *слов0>а́*
* *у́мн>а́*
* *умн>а́*
* *сёст^Fёра́>ы*
* *сёст00р0>ы*
* *се́м^Fе́йя́>у́*
* *сем00ь0>ю́*
* *прочи́та́<ем*
* *прочита́<ем*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/002 <==
============================================================================
* *Тама́ра>а*
* *Тама́р0>а*
* *мо́ре>о*
* *мо́р0>е*
* *Петр>овна>а*
* *Петр>овн0>а*
* *о́к^Fоно>о́*
* *ок00н0>о́*
* *зе́м^Fе́ля́>е́*
* *зем00л0>е́*
* *б^Fе́й<у́*
* *б00ь<ю́*
* *б^Fе́й<^Sте*
* *б0е́й<0те*
* *ж^Fёг<ла́*
* *ж00г<ла́*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/003 <==
============================================================================
* *ли́х>е́е*
* *ли́ш>е0*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/004 <==
============================================================================
* *люб^Fо́вь>ы́*
* *люб00в0>и́*
* *люб^Fо́вь>ью*
* *люб0о́в0>ью*
* *кни́га>ов*
* *кни́г0>00*
* *чудо́вище>ов*
* *чудо́вищ0>00*
* *пти́ца>ов*
* *пти́ц0>00*
* *пи́ла́>о́в*
* *пи́л0>00*
* *ба́ш^Fеня>ов*
* *ба́ш0ен0>00*
* *се́м^Fе́йя́>ов*
* *сем0е́й0>00*
* *ва́йя>ов*
* *ва́й0>00*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/005 <==
============================================================================
* *с^Oго́н^M<ю́*
* *с0гон0<ю́*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/006 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/007 <==
============================================================================
* *раз^oш^Fе́й<у́*
* *разош00ь<ю́*
* *раз^oши́л*
* *рас0ши́л*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/008 <==
============================================================================
* *ко́сть>ь*
* *ко́ст0>ь*
* *ми́лость>ы*
* *ми́лост0>и*
* *во́сь^Fемь>ь*
* *во́с00ем0>ь*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/009 <==
============================================================================
* *музе́й>а*
* *музе́0>я*
* *Гава́йй>ы*
* *Гава́й0>и*
* *копе́й^Fека>ов*
* *копе́00ек0>00*
* *ли́х>е́й*
* *ли́ш>е0*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/010 <==
============================================================================
* *мурав^Fе́й>а́*
* *мурав00ь>я́*
* *бел^Fе́йё>о́*
* *бел00ь0>ё*
* *б^Fе́й<у́*
* *б00ь<ю́*
* *вы́бурав<й*
* *вы́бурав<ь*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/011 <==
============================================================================
* *но́в>^Z*
* *но́в>0*
* *столе́т^Fень>^Z*
* *столе́т0ен0>0*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/012 <==
============================================================================
* *си́нь>^Z*
* *си́н0>ь*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/013 <==
============================================================================
* *длинноше́й>^Z*
* *длинноше́0>й*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/014 <==
============================================================================
* *хоро́ш>ому*
* *хоро́ш>ему*
* *па́ль^Fец>ом*
* *па́ль00ц>ем*
* *музе́й>ом*
* *музе́0>ем*
* *си́нь>ой*
* *си́н0>ей*
* *сча́ст^Fий>ом*
* *сча́ст00ь>ем*
* *ва́йя>ой*
* *ва́й0>ей*
* *Гава́йй>ов*
* *Гава́й0>ев*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/015 <==
============================================================================
* *кни́га>ы*
* *кни́г0>и*
* *хоро́ш>ый*
* *хоро́ш>ий*
* *музе́й>ы*
* *музе́0>и*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/016 <==
============================================================================
* *слы́ш<ю*
* *слы́ш<у*
* *и́ск^M<я́*
* *и0щ0<а́*

==> sourced from phonology-rules/017 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/018 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/019 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/020 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/021 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/022 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/023 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/024 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/025 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/026 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/027 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/028 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/029 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/030 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/031 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/032 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/033 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/034 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/035 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/036 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/037 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/038 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/039 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/040 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/041 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/042 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/043 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/044 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/045 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/046 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/047 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/048 <==
============================================================================

==> sourced from phonology-rules/049 <==
============================================================================

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/trondtynnol/lang-rus-trondtynnol/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>
